Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1346
Unlawful acts; obtaining confidential public information; penalties.

Any person who intentionally accesses or causes to be accessed any computer, computer system, computer software, or computer network without authorization, or who, having accessed a computer, computer system, computer software, or computer network with authorization, knowingly and intentionally exceeds the limits of such authorization, and thereby obtains information filed by the public with the state or any political subdivision which is by statute required to be kept confidential shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. For any second or subsequent offense under this section, such person shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1985, LB 371, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 8.